District of Columbia statutes.
1-207.01

Referendum.

On a date to be fixed by the Board of Elections, not more than five months after December 24, 1973 a referendum (in this part referred to as the “charter referendum”) shall be conducted to determine whether the registered qualified electors of the District accept the charter set forth in subchapter IV of this chapter.

Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 779, Pub. L. 93-198, title VII, § 701